Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-1402
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Precision Agriculture Infrastructure Grant Act:

(1) Adequate precision agriculture connectivity means a download speed of at least one hundred megabits per second and an upload speed of at least twenty megabits per second;

(2) Commission means the Public Service Commission;

(3) Program means the Precision Agriculture Infrastructure Grant Program created in section 86-1403; and

(4) Provider means a wireless network provider that provides adequate precision agriculture connectivity.

Laws 2022, LB1144, § 13.